Nevada, session 83, SB267.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 211 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a county or city jail or detention facility determines that
a prisoner has been charged with a designated offense and is
unlawfully present in the United States or did not possess the
necessary documents when applying for admission, the county or
city jail or detention facility shall provide the name of the prisoner
and the offense for which the prisoner was charged to a United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement officer.
2. As used in this section, “designated offense” means:
(a) A crime of violence, as defined in NRS 200.120;
(b) A battery that constitutes domestic violence pursuant to
NRS 33.018;
(c) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120, 484C.130,
484C.430, 488.410, 488.420 or 488.425;
(d) A violation of NRS 453.3385, 453.3387 or 453.339; or
(e) An offense involving burglary, theft or larceny.
Sec. 2. NRS 228.206 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.206 1. The Attorney General shall, in consultation with
relevant stakeholders and the Keep Nevada Working Task Force
created by NRS 225.520, publish model policies which provide
guidance and training recommendations to state or local law
enforcement agencies. The model policies must prioritize guidance
and training recommendations which [:
(a) Foster] foster trust between the community and state or local
law enforcement agencies . [; and
(b) Limit, to the fullest extent practicable and consistent with
any applicable law, the engagement of state or local law
enforcement agencies with federal immigration authorities for the
purpose of immigration enforcement.]
2. Each state or local law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Adopt policies consistent with the model policies of the
Attorney General published pursuant to subsection 1; or
(b) Notify the Attorney General that the state or local law
enforcement agency is not adopting policies consistent with the
model policies of the Attorney General.
3. The notification described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2
must include, without limitation:
-
*SB267*

– 3 –
(a) The reason that the state or local law enforcement agency is
not adopting policies consistent with the model policies of the
Attorney General; and
(b) A copy of the policies of the state or local law enforcement
agency.
4. As used in this section, “state or local law enforcement
agency” means:
(a) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(b) A metropolitan police department;
(c) A police department of an incorporated city;
(d) Any entity authorized to operate a prison, jail or detention
facility, including, without limitation, any facility for the detention
of juveniles;
(e) The Division of Parole and Probation of the Department of
Public Safety;
(f) Any department of alternative sentencing; and
(g) Any other state or local agency, office, bureau, department,
unit or division created by any statute, ordinance or rule which:
(1) Has a duty to enforce the law; and
(2) Employs any person upon whom some or all of the
powers of a peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to
289.360, inclusive.
Sec. 3. NRS 211.007 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
211.007 Required information before questioning prisoner
regarding immigration status. Before questioning a prisoner
who is in the custody of a county or city jail or detention facility
regarding his or her immigration status, the person seeking to
question the prisoner shall inform the prisoner of the purpose of the
questions regarding the immigration status of the prisoner.
H
-
*SB267*